Hawaii statutes.
[§487N-6] Personal information security;
best practices; websites. (a) The council shall identify best practices
to assist government agencies in improving security and privacy programs
relating to personal information. No later than March 31, 2009, the
council shall identify best practices relating to:

(1) Automated tools;

(2) Training;

(3) Processes; and

(4) Applicable standards.

(b) No later than July 31, 2009, the best
practices identified by the council shall be posted on each government agency's
website in a manner that is readily accessible by employees of the government
agency. [L Sp 2008, c 10, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next